Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2727XS (5) 91 as/js S.F. 400 Section 1. Section 124.208, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. Abortifacients. Any material, 3 compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of 4 the following substances: 5 a. (Â±)-METHYL (1R,2R,3R)-3-HYDROXY-2-((E)-(4RS)-4-HYDROXY-4- 6 METHYL-1-OCTENYL)-5-OXOCYCLOPENTANEHEPTANOATE. Other name: 7 Misoprostol. 8 b. (aa [beta], 17 [beta])-11-[4-(dimethylamino)-phenyl]-17- 9 hydroxy-17-(1-propynyl)estra-4,9-dien-3-one-11 [beta]-[4-(N,N- 10 dimethylamino)phenyl]-17[alpha]-(propyl-1-ynyl)-[delta]-4,9- 11 estradiene-17 [beta]-ol-3-one 11-((4-dimethylamino) phenyl)-1 12 7-hydroxy-17-(1-propynyl) estra-4,9-dien-3-one. Other name: 13 Mifepristone. 14 c. N-[4-[[(2,4-diamino-6-pteridinyl)methyl]methylamino] 15 benzoyl]-L-glutamic acid. Other name: Methotrexate. 16